Washington statutes.
RCW 19.148.020

Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Lender" shall mean any person in the business of making a loan.

(2) "Loan" shall mean any loan used to finance the acquisition of a one-to-four family owner-occupied residence located in this state.

(3) "Purchasing servicing agent" is any person who purchases, receives through transfer or assignment, or otherwise acquires the responsibility of the servicing for a loan.

(4) "Person" shall include an individual, firm, association, partnership, business, trust, corporation, or any other legal entity whether resident or nonresident.

[ 1989 c 98 s 2.]